Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
[OLD] GENERAL OBLIGATION AND REFUNDING BONDS

§§39-1 to 15 REPEALED. L 1988, c 28,
§2.

PART I.
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS

Cross References

County bond issues, see chapter 47.

Issuance of indebtedness; debt limit; exclusions, see Const.
art. VII, §§12, 13.

§39-1 Authorization to issue; amount.
The director of finance of the State, with the approval of the governor, may
issue from time to time general obligation bonds of the State, to an amount not
exceeding the total amount of those bonds authorized to be issued by acts of
the legislature and any amendments thereto in effect at the date of issue of
the bonds, and not exceeding the debt limitations prescribed by the
Constitution of the State of Hawaii. Except as otherwise specifically provided
in the act or acts authorizing the issuance thereof, the bonds shall be issued
in the manner and upon the terms provided in this part. [L 1988, c 28, pt of
§3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next